Hawaii statutes.
[§489D-26] Orders to cease and desist. (a)
If the commissioner determines a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or
an order issued under this chapter by a licensee or authorized delegate is:

(1) Likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to
the licensee, the licensee's customers, or the public as a result of the
violation; or

(2) Cause insolvency or significant dissipation of
assets of the licensee,

the commissioner may issue an order requiring the
licensee or authorized delegate to cease and desist from the violation. The
order becomes effective upon service of the order upon the licensee or
authorized delegate.

(b) The commissioner may order a licensee to
cease and desist from providing money transmission services through an
authorized delegate that is the subject of a separate order pursuant to section
489D-25 by the commissioner.

(c) An order to cease and desist remains
effective and enforceable pending the completion of an administrative
proceeding pursuant to chapter 91.

(d) A licensee or an authorized delegate that is
served with an order to cease and desist may petition the circuit court for a
judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the enforcement,
operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the completion of an
administrative proceeding pursuant to section 489D-31 or 489D-32.

(e) The commissioner shall commence an
administrative proceeding pursuant to chapter 91 within twenty days after
issuing an order to cease and desist.

(f) The commissioner may apply to the circuit
court for an appropriate order to protect the public interest. [L 2006, c 153,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next